South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4741.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 150, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-150-385.  (A) There is established the Tuition Gap Scholarship Program for the purpose of ensuring that eligible students receiving LIFE Scholarships, HOPE Scholarships, or Palmetto Fellows Scholarships have their remaining tuition costs fully covered during any semester in which they receive such scholarship awards. (B) A student who is enrolled at a public institution of higher learning in South Carolina and who receives a LIFE Scholarship, HOPE Scholarship, or Palmetto Fellows Scholarship is eligible to receive a Tuition Gap Scholarship for each semester in which they remain eligible for and receive one of these scholarships. (C) The amount of the Tuition Gap Scholarship must be equal to the difference between: (1) the actual cost of full-time tuition for in-state students at the eligible public institution of higher learning in which the student is enrolled; and (2) the total value of the LIFE, HOPE, or Palmetto Fellows Scholarship awarded to the student for that semester, including any STEM supplements. (D) The Tuition Gap Scholarship may not be used to pay any fees, room and board, books, or other nontuition expenses. (E) The Commission on Higher Education shall administer the Tuition Gap Scholarship Program and shall: (1) develop application and verification procedures; (2) ensure coordination with public institutions of higher learning to calculate tuition costs and scholarship shortfalls; and (3) annually report to the General Assembly on the number of recipients, disbursements, and fiscal impact. (F) The Tuition Gap Scholarships must be funded exclusively from proceeds of the South Carolina Education Lottery. No general fund appropriations may be used for this purpose. (G) The commission shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to the academic year beginning in Fall Semester of 2027. ----XX----